Utah statutes.
75-5-406.   Protective proceedings -- Request for notice -- Interested
person.
Any interested person who desires to be notified before any order is made in a
protective proceeding may file with the registrar a request for notice
subsequent to payment of any fee required by statute or court rule. The clerk
shall mail a copy of the demand to the conservator if one has been appointed.
A request is not effective unless it contains a statement showing the interest
of the person making it and his address, or that of his attorney, and is
effective only as to matters occurring after the filing. Any governmental
agency paying or planning to pay benefits to the person to be protected is an
interested person in protective proceedings.
